Missouri, session 2026, HB3386.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Sections 640.220 and 643.350, RSMo, are repealed and two new sections
enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as sections 640.220 and 643.350, to read as follows:
640.220. 1. For the purpose of protecting the air, water and land resources of the
state, there is hereby created in the state treasury a fund to be known as the "Natural
Resources Protection Fund". All funds received from air pollution permit fees, gifts,
bequests, donations, or any other moneys so designated shall be paid to the director of the
department of natural resources, transmitted to the director of revenue and deposited in the
state treasury to the credit of an appropriate subaccount of the natural resources protection
fund and shall be used for the purposes specified by law. The air pollution permit fee
revenues shall be deposited in an appropriate subaccount of the natural resources protection
fund and, subject to appropriation by the general assembly, shall be used by the department to
carry out the general administration of section 643.075. The water pollution permit fee
revenues generated through sections 644.052, 644.053, 644.054 and 644.061 shall be paid to
the director of the department of natural resources, transmitted to the director of the
department of revenue and deposited to the credit of the water pollution permit fee
subaccount of the natural resources protection fund and, subject to appropriation by the
general assembly, shall be used by the department to carry out the administration of sections
644.006 to 644.141.
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 3386 2
2. Effective July 1, 1991, and before June 30, 2027,the provisions of section 33.080
to the contrary notwithstanding, any unexpended balance in the subaccounts of the natural
resources protection fund that exceeds the preceding biennium's collections shall revert to the
general revenue fund of the state at the end of each biennium. Beginning July 1, 2027, any
unexpended balance in the subaccounts of the natural resources protection fund that
exceeds the preceding biennium's collections shall not revert to the general revenue fund
of the state at the end of each biennium. All interest earned on the natural resources
protection funds shall accrue to appropriate subaccounts.
3. Beginning July 1, 2027, and annually on July first of each succeeding year, the
commissioner of administration shall use taxable sales reports to estimate the amount of
state general revenue sales and use tax derived from electric power distribution (NAICS
code 221122, or its successor) in the immediately preceding calendar year and shall
report such amount to the state treasurer. The state treasurer shall transfer five percent
of such general revenue sales and use taxes to the air pollution permit fees subaccount of
the natural resources protection fund and such funds, subject to appropriation by the
general assembly, shall be used by the department solely for the purpose of funding the
air pollution control program. Any provision of law to the contrary notwithstanding,
amounts transferred in accordance with this subsection shall not revert to the general
revenue fund of the state at the end of each biennium and shall be used solely for the
purpose of funding the air pollution control program.
643.350. 1. A fee, not to exceed twenty-four dollars, may be charged for an
emissions inspection conducted under the emissions inspection program established pursuant
to sections 643.300 to 643.355.
2. The fee shall be conspicuously posted on the premises of each emissions inspection
station.
3. The commission shall establish, by rule, the portion of the fee amount to be
remitted by the emission inspection station to the director of revenue and the number of days
allowed for remitting fees.
4. The official emission inspection station shall remit the portion of fees collected, as
established by the commission pursuant to this section, to the state treasurer within the time
period established by the commission. The state treasurer shall deposit the fees received in
the state treasury to the credit of the "Missouri Air Emission Reduction Fund", which is
hereby created. Moneys in the fund shall, subject to appropriation, be expended for the
administration and enforcement of sections 643.300 to 643.355 by the department of natural
resources, the Missouri highway patrol, and other appropriate agencies. Any balance in the
fund at the end of the biennium shall remain in the fund and shall not be subject to the
provisions of section 33.080. All interest earned by moneys in the fund shall accrue to the

HB 3386 3
fund. [If in the immediate previous fiscal year, the state's net general revenue did not increase
by two percent or more, the state treasurer may deposit moneys, except for gifts, donations, or
bequests, received under this section beginning January first of the current fiscal year into the
state general revenue fund. Otherwise, the state treasurer shall deposit such moneys in
accordance with the provisions of this section.]
5. In addition to funds from the Missouri air emission reduction fund, costs of capital
or operations may be supplemented, upon appropriation, from the general revenue fund, the
state highway department fund, federal funds or other funds available for that purpose.
✔